Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1573
Discovery of property of debtor; appointment of receiver; transfer of nonexempt property; power of court to prevent.

The judge may also, by order, appoint the sheriff of the proper county, or other suitable person, a receiver of the property of the judgment debtor, in the same manner and with the like authority as if the appointment were made by the court. The judge may also, by order, forbid a transfer or other disposition of the property of the judgment debtor, not exempt by law, and any interference therewith.

R.S.1867, Code § 542, p. 489;

R.S.1913, § 8121;

C.S.1922, § 9057;

C.S.1929, § 20-1575;

R.S.1943, § 25-1573.